Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-425 Powers of conservator in
administration. (a) Except as otherwise qualified or limited by the court
in its order of appointment and endorsed on the letters, a conservator has all
of the powers granted in this section and any additional powers granted by law
to a trustee in this State.

(b) A conservator, acting reasonably and in an
effort to accomplish the purpose of the appointment, and without further court
authorization or confirmation, may:

(1) Collect, hold, and retain assets of the estate,
including assets in which the conservator has a personal interest and real
property in another state, until the conservator considers that disposition of
an asset should be made;

(2) Receive additions to the estate;

(3) Continue or participate in the operation of any
business or other enterprise;

(4) Acquire an undivided interest in an asset of the
estate in which the conservator, in any fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided
interest;

(5) Invest assets of the estate as though the
conservator were a trustee;

(6) Deposit money of the estate in a financial
institution, including one operated by the conservator;

(7) Acquire or dispose of an asset of the estate,
including real property in another state, for cash or on credit, at public or
private sale, and manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the
character of, or abandon an asset of the estate; provided that
any sale of real property in the State shall be subject to confirmation
pursuant to section 531-29;

(8) Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or
alterations in buildings or other structures, demolish any improvements, and
raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings;

(9) Subdivide, develop, or dedicate land to public
use, make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries, adjust
differences in valuation or exchange or partition by giving or receiving
considerations, and dedicate easements to public use without consideration;

(10) Enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or
lessee, with or without option to purchase or renew, for a term within or
extending beyond the term of the conservatorship;

(11) Enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration
and removal of minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or
unitization agreement;

(12) Grant an option involving disposition of an asset
of the estate and take an option for the acquisition of any asset;

(13) Vote a security, in person or by general or
limited proxy;

(14) Pay calls, assessments, and any other sums
chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities;

(15) Sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion
rights;

(16) Consent, directly or through a committee or other
agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or
liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

(17) Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in
other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the
security may pass by delivery;

(18) Insure the assets of the estate against damage or
loss and the conservator against liability with respect to a third person;

(19) Borrow money, with or without security, to be
repaid from the estate or otherwise and advance money for the protection of the
estate or the protected person and for all expenses, losses, and liability
sustained in the administration of the estate or because of the holding or
ownership of any assets, for which the conservator has a lien on the estate as
against the protected person for advances so made;

(20) Pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or
against the estate or the protected person by compromise, arbitration, or
otherwise, and release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the estate
to the extent the claim is uncollectible;

(21) Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the conservator
and any guardian, and other expenses incurred in the collection, care,
administration, and protection of the estate;

(22) Allocate items of income or expense to income or
principal of the estate, as provided by other law, including creation of reserves
out of income for depreciation, obsolescence, or amortization or for depletion
of minerals or other natural resources;

(23) Pay any sum distributable to a protected person
or individual who is in fact dependent on the protected person by paying the sum
to the distributee or by paying the sum for the use of the distributee:

(A) To the guardian of the distributee;

(B) To a distributee's custodian under
chapter 553A or custodial trustee under chapter 554B; or

(C) If there is no guardian, custodian, or
custodial trustee, to a relative or other person having physical custody of the
distributee;

(24) Prosecute or defend actions, claims, or
proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of assets of the estate and
of the conservator in the performance of fiduciary duties; and

(25) Execute and deliver all instruments that will
accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the powers vested in the conservator.

(c) In investing the estate, and in selecting
assets of the estate for distribution under section 560:5-427, in utilizing
powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of
the protected person and exercisable by the conservator or the court, and in
exercising any other power vested in them, the conservator and the court shall
take into account any known estate plan of the protected person, including the
protected person's will, any revocable trust of which the protected person is
settlor, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with
provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at the protected
person's death to another or others which the protected person may have
originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected person. [L
2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next